Utah statutes.
70C-6-101.   Scope -- Relation to credit insurance -- Applicability to
parties.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), this chapter applies to insurance
provided or to be provided in connection with any consumer credit transaction
subject to this title.
(2)  The provision on cancellation by a creditor under Section 70C-6-304
applies to extensions of credit, the primary purpose of which is the financing
of insurance.  No other provision of this chapter applies to insurance so
financed.
(3)  Except as provided elsewhere under this title, this chapter supplements
and does not supersede Title 31A, Chapter 22, Part 8, Credit Life and Accident
and Health Insurance.  The provisions of this title concerning administrative
controls, liabilities, and penalties do not apply to persons acting as
insurers, and the similar provisions of the Credit Insurance Act do not apply
to creditors and debtors.
